src-fst-morphology-affixes-nouns.lexc.md
* **LEXICON BOAHTINLONGSHORT**  Intransitiv action nouns from bisyll verbs, long and short cmp-form

* **LEXICON BOAHTIN**  Intransitiv action nouns from bisyll verbs, long cmp-form

* **LEXICON PRE_BOAHTIN**  Intransitiv action nouns from bisyll verbs, long cmp-form

* **LEXICON BOAHTINsemact**  adds Sem/Act

* **LEXICON BOAHTINSHORT** Intransitiv action nouns from bisyll verbs, short cmp-form

* **LEXICON IHTAMAT** Plural action nouns, from bisyllabic verbs

* **LEXICON LEXDIMINC** diminutives, these comes from noun stems file, from trisyll nouns

Contracted nouns

* **LEXICON BOAZU** Anim. Contracted 0-Nouns. Short compound-forms.

* **LEXICON SUOLU** Inanim. Contracted 0-Nouns. Short compound-forms.

* **LEXICON SUOLULONG** Inanim. Contracted 0-Nouns. Long compound-forms.

* **LEXICON FALIS** Contracted Anim. C-Nouns.  Short compound-forms.

* **LEXICON LASIS** Contracted Inanim. C-Nouns.  Short compound-forms.

Contracted nouns

* **LEXICON GISTTA** The Noun gistta, gist -

* **LEXICON CEAHKES** only -ceahkes

* **LEXICON ALLGUOVT** guovttos guovttis

* **LEXICON GUOVTTIS_N**  only -guovttis

* **LEXICON GUOVTTU** only -guovttos

* **LEXICON GIRKOSADDOT** LIKE SATTU but pl, only

# Sublexica for nominal stems

## Declension

### Noun declension

* **LEXICON GOAHTI-NE** Bisyll. V-Nouns; Nominative Sg. and Essive

* **LEXICON NomV**

* **LEXICON EssV**

* **LEXICON GOAHTI-OBL**

* **LEXICON KONSERTA-ERR** for some forms without dipth

* **LEXICON GOAHTI-IU-OBL**

## Px lexica

* **LEXICON NPx3Vflag**

* **LEXICON NPx3Vvowchflag**

* **LEXICON NPx12A** For loan word ending -a

* **LEXICON NPx3A** For loan word ending -a

* **LEXICON NPxA** For loan word ending -a

* **LEXICON NPxPlComC**

* **LEXICON NPxVvowch** for vowel stems, with X2, X1 with stem vowel change,

* **LEXICON NPx12Vvowch** for vowel stems, with X2, X1 with stem vowel change, 1. and 2. p

* **LEXICON NPx1Vvowch** for vowel stems, with X2, X1 with stem vowel change, 1. p

* **LEXICON NPx3Vvowch** for vowel stems, with X2, X1 with stem vowel change,  3. pers

* **LEXICON NPxV**

* **LEXICON NPx1V**

* **LEXICON NPx2V**

* **LEXICON NPx3V**

* **LEXICON NPxC**

* **LEXICON NPx1C**

* **LEXICON NPx12C**

* **LEXICON NPx3C**

* **LEXICON NPxPlComV1**

## Some GOAHTE-type lexica...

* **LEXICON GOAHTE-** compound lexicon

* **LEXICON GOAHTICMP** compound lexicon, vowel shortening

* **LEXICON GOAHTILONGCMP** compound lexicon, no vowel shortening

* **LEXICON GOAHTILONGSHORTCMP** compound lexicon, with and without vowel shortening

* **LEXICON GOADE-IU-** genitiv

* **LEXICON GOAHTA-** Lexicon for giving Px 1. and 2. p., pluss illativ

* **LEXICON GOAHTAI** illative

* **LEXICON GOADI-** weak grade

* **LEXICON GOADI-_notCmp**

* **LEXICON GODII-** diphthong simplification

* **LEXICON GOADA-**

## Other lexica

* **LEXICON STAHTACASE** for no cons grad

* **LEXICON EGEZHAHKII**

* **LEXICON MALIS0** as GAPPUS0. MALIS0 has no VUOHTA, GAPPUS0 has no Px Ess

* **LEXICON MALLAS-**

* **LEXICON MALLASI-/NUORABU-** joint cont. lexicon

* **LEXICON MALLASI-/NUORABUj-** joint cont. lexicon

* **LEXICON MUSHcase** Deverbal nouns

* **LEXICON MUSSHA**

* **LEXICON EAMOSHcase**  Deverbal nouns

* **LEXICON AMOSHcase**

* **LEXICON BOAHTINcase**  Long compound-forms

* **LEXICON BOAHTINLONGSHORTTV**  Transitiv Action nouns. Both long and short compound forms

* **LEXICON BOAHTINLONGSHORTTVcase** +CmpN/Sg +CmpN/SgNomLeft +CmpN/SgNomLeft +CmpN/SgGenLeft +CmpN/PlGenLeft

* **LEXICON BOAHTINTV**  Transitiv Action nouns. Long compound forms

* **LEXICON BOAHTINTVcase** +CmpN/Sg   +CmpN/SgNomLeft +CmpN/SgNomLeft +CmpN/SgGenLeft +CmpN/PlGenLeft

* **LEXICON BOAHTINTVCT**

* **LEXICON BOAHTINSHORTTV**  Transitiv Action nouns. Short compound forms

* **LEXICON BOAHTINSHORTTVcase** +CmpN/Sg   +CmpN/SgNomLeft +CmpN/SgNomLeft +CmpN/SgGenLeft +CmpN/PlGenLeft

* **LEXICON BOAHTINSHORTTVCT**

* **LEXICON BOAHTALADDANTV**  Transitiv Action nouns from deverbal verbs

* **LEXICON BOAHTALADDANTVcase** +CmpN/Sg   +CmpN/SgNomLeft +CmpN/SgNomLeft +CmpN/SgGenLeft +CmpN/PlGenLeft

* **LEXICON BOAHTALADDANTVCT**

* **LEXICON FALLA-**

* **LEXICON BOAZU-NE**

* **LEXICON BOHCCO**

* **LEXICON BOHCCU**

* **LEXICON KEAHTTA** Derivation keahttá/keahtes

* **LEXICON KEAHTTA-PRED** Der/keahtta - only predforms

* **LEXICON DIMINC** diminutives, these comes from noun affix file,  from trisyll nouns

* **LEXICON GUOVDDAZI-** joint cont. lexicon

* **LEXICON JOHTOLAT0**

* **LEXICON JOHTOLAHKA-**

* **LEXICON DenominalNounsV** diminutives from bisyllabic nouns

* **LEXICON DenominalNounsC** diminutives from trisyllabic nouns

* **LEXICON MUITTASJEAPMI** action noun, from trisyll intransitive verb

* **LEXICON EAPMITV** +CmpN/Sg +CmpN/SgNomLeft +CmpN/SgGenLeft +CmpN/PlGenLeft

* **LEXICON EAPMITVCT** action noun, from bisyll transitive verb

* **LEXICON EAPMITVCTcase**

* **LEXICON MUITTASJEAPMITV** +CmpN/Sg   +CmpN/SgNomLeft +CmpN/SgGenLeft +CmpN/PlGenLeft

* **LEXICON MUITTASJEAPMITVCT** action noun, from trisyll intransitive verb

* **LEXICON VUONAT** +CmpN/SgN +CmpN/SgG +CmpN/PlG

* **LEXICON VUONATCT** derivated nouns, from propers: guovdageainnut, divttasvuonat etc.

* **LEXICON ACTORder** +CmpN/SgN +CmpN/SgG +CmpN/PlG

* **LEXICON ACTORderCT** Tagged NomAg nowadays, Long compound-forms, from intransitive verbs

* **LEXICON ACTORderCTcase** Tagged NomAg nowadays, Long compound-forms, from intransitive verbs

+Use/NG: GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon

* **LEXICON ACTORTVder** +CmpN/SgN +CmpN/SgG +CmpN/PlG +CmpN/SgNomLeft +CmpN/SgGenLeft +CmpN/PlGenLeft

* **LEXICON ACTORTVderCT** Tagged NomAg nowadays, Long compound-forms, from transitive verbs

* **LEXICON ACTORBIEHTTIder** +CmpN/SgN +CmpN/SgG +CmpN/PlG +CmpN/SgNomLeft +CmpN/SgGenLeft +CmpN/PlGenLeft 

* **LEXICON ACTORSHORTTVder** Tagged NomAg nowadays, Short compound-forms, from transitive verbs

* **LEXICON DIMINV** diminutives, these comes from bisyll nouns

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-sme/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc)</small>
